Wyoming, session 2025, HB0321.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-8-101(e) and 22-8-112 are amended
to read:

22-8-101. Notice of election officials needed; county
chairmen to submit list of names; municipal clerks list of
names appointment.

(e) If the list of nominees for judges of election
and members of counting boards provided by the county
HB0321

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0797
chairman is insufficient, the county clerk shall consider
the list submitted by the municipal clerks and may appoint
any elector otherwise qualified to be a judge of election
or a member of a counting board. When appointing election
judges, the lists provided by the county chairmen of the
major and minor political parties pursuant to subsection
(b) of this section shall be given priority over the list
submitted by the municipal clerks.

22-8-112. Filling vacancies.

(a) Any vacancy occurring prior to an election day
shall be filled by the county clerk from the list of
alternates. When filling a vacancy from the list of
alternates, the registered electors appearing on the lists
submitted by the county chairmen of the major and minor
political parties pursuant to W.S. 22-8-101(b) shall be
given priority. If no alternates exist, any elector who is
qualified may be appointed. Any expedient method of notice
of appointment to the county clerk and to the appointee may
be used. Vacancies may be filled temporarily or for the
term.

HB0321

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0797
(b) If a judge is not present when polls open, or is
unable to complete his duties, the vacancy shall be filled
by a registered elector appointed by those judges present
at the precinct polling place when the vacancy occurs and
approved by the county clerk. When filling a vacancy under
this subsection, the lists of registered electors provided
by the county chairmen of the major and minor political
parties pursuant to W.S. 22-8-101(b) shall be given
priority. If a member of a counting board is not present
when the polls close, or is unable to complete his duties,
the vacancy shall be filled by a registered elector
appointed by those members of the counting board who are
present.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0321